Alaska, session 34, SB259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 29.45.110 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 05 (f) A municipality may, by ordinance, prohibit the assessor from increasing 06 the assessed value of real property over the previous year's assessed value by a 07 percentage amount. The percentage amount may not be less than three percent nor 08 more than 10 percent. Notwithstanding (a) of this section or standards adopted by the 09 department under (e) of this section, the full and true value of a property assessed 10 under an ordinance adopted under this subsection is equal to the assessed value. The 11 state may not penalize a municipality for adopting an ordinance under this subsection. 12 An ordinance adopted under this subsection 13 (1) may include other requirements to administer and enforce the 14 ordinance; 01 (2) must require that the real property is occupied as housing; 02 (3) must allow the assessor to increase the assessed value of the 03 property if the property is improved or ownership of the real property is transferred to 04 the estimated price that the property would bring in an open market and under 05 prevailing market conditions in a sale between a willing seller and a willing buyer 06 both conversant with the property and with prevailing general price levels; and 07 (4) must require the assessor to increase the assessed value of the 08 property every 10 years to the estimated price that the property would bring in an open 09 market and under prevailing market conditions in a sale between a willing seller and a 10 willing buyer both conversant with the property and with prevailing general price 11 levels. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.